Alabama, session 2026rs, HB359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
10 Section 1. Sections 40-18-470, 40-18-471, 40-18-472,
11 and 40-18-473, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
12 follows:
13 "§40-18-470
14 (a) This article shall be known and may be cited as the
15 Sweet Home Alabama Tourism Investment Act.
16 (b) For purposes of this article, the following words
17 and phrases have the following meanings:
18 (1) APPLICANT. Any corporation, limited liability
19 company, partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or
20 other legal entity authorized to do business in the State of
21 Alabama.
22 (2) APPROVED COMPANY. Any company approved for tax
23 rebates for operating a certified tourism destination project.
24 (3) APPROVED COSTS. Costs relating to the following:
25 a. Land acquisition.
26 b. Construction.
27 c. Engineering.
28 d. Design.
Page 1

d. Design.
HB359 Enrolled
29 e. Costs of contract bonds and insurances.
30 f. Installation of utilities paid by the applicant,
31 including project-specific off-site extensions.
32 (4) BOARD. Alabama Tourism Advisory Board established
33 pursuant to Section 41-7-3.
34 (5) CAPITAL INVESTMENT. All costs and expenses incurred
35 by the incentivized company in connection with the
36 acquisition, construction, installation, and equipping of a
37 qualifying project, if such costs are required to be
38 capitalized for purposes of the federal income tax, determined
39 without regard to any rule that permits expenditures properly
40 chargeable to a capital account to be treated as current
41 expenditures. However, any project involving the extraction of
42 natural resources shall not be included as a capital
43 investment expenditure.
44 (6) CERTIFIED TOURISM DESTINATION PROJECT.
45 a. A certified tourism destination project must conduct
46 an activity specified in subparagraphs 1. through 8.
47 1. A qualifying project that has seventy-five million
48 dollars ($75,000,000) of capital investments may be considered
49 a mega project.
50 2. A qualifying project may be a tourist destination
51 attraction with a minimum private investment of not less than
52 fifty million dollars ($50,000,000).
53 3. A qualifying project may be a tourism attraction
54 with a minimum private investment of thirty-five million
55 dollars ($35,000,000) located within an entertainment
56 district. The attraction must be open to the public at least
Page 2

district. The attraction must be open to the public at least
HB359 Enrolled
57 five days per week, serve food and beverages, and provide live
58 entertainment at least three nights per week.
59 4. A qualifying project may be a resort development
60 with a minimum investment of thirty-five million dollars
61 ($35,000,000) and consists of a hotel with a minimum of 200
62 guest rooms and or 200 units that may be used for vacation
63 rental. The development must also include guest amenities such
64 as restaurants, golf courses, spas, entertainment activities,
65 and other amenities.
66 5. A qualifying project may be a tourism destination
67 attraction with a minimum investment of thirty-five million
68 dollars ($35,000,000) located within a historic district where
69 the district is listed in the National Register of Historic
70 Places.
71 6. Retail related to a qualifying project must consist
72 primarily of upscale brands or their equivalent. Retail
73 activities not eligible for a rebate include the following:
74 A.i. Department stores.
75 B.ii. Convenience stores.
76 C.iii. Grocery stores.
77 D.iv. Liquor and tobacco stores.
78 E.v. Discount stores.
79 F.vi. Multiplex theaters.
80 G.vii. Facilities that perform cleaning, repair, or
81 alteration services.
82 H.viii. Facilities that perform personal salon services
83 such as tanning, nail, and beauty.
84 7. A qualifying project may be any combination of
Page 3

7. A qualifying project may be any combination of
HB359 Enrolled
85 qualifying tourist attractions, hotels, marinas, and resorts
86 with a minimum private investment of thirty-five million
87 dollars ($35,000,000) in land, buildings, architecture,
88 engineering, fixtures, equipment, furnishings, amenities, and
89 other related approved soft costs.
90 b. Projects that cannot be certified as an eligible
91 certified tourism destination project include the following:
92 1. Expansions of any existing projects previously
93 approved that are not equal to the lesser of 75 percent of the
94 original capital investment or thirty-five million dollars
95 ($35,000,000).
96 2. Facilities that are primarily developed for retail
97 sales that are not certified as a resort development. Pro
98 shops, souvenir shops, gift shops, concessions, and similar
99 retail activities may not be included within the definition of
100 a "tourism destination project."
101 (7) COMPLETION DATE. A date by which the approved
102 company shall have completed the tourism destination project.
103 The completion date must occur within three years of the date
104 of the financial incentive agreement unless an extension is
105 granted by the board. Completion date is the date the project
106 is placed in service and is generating revenue.
107 (7)(8) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Tourism Department.
108 (8)(9) PROJECT. Any land, building, or other
109 improvement, and all real and personal property, whether or
110 not contiguous and whether or not previously in existence, if
111 in Alabama and if deemed necessary or useful in connection
112 with certified destination projects.
Page 4

with certified destination projects.
HB359 Enrolled
113 (9)(10) QUALIFYING PROJECT. Any project to be
114 undertaken by an approved company that is deemed a certified
115 tourism destination project.
116 (10)(11) TOURISM DESTINATION ATTRACTION. Tourist
117 attractions that qualify include the following:
118 a. Theme parks.
119 b. Water parks.
120 c. Entertainment parks or outdoor adventure parks.
121 d. Cultural or historical interpretive educational
122 centers or museums.
123 e. Motor speedways.
124 f. Indoor or outdoor entertainment centers or
125 complexes.
126 g. Convention centers.
127 h. Professional sports facilities.
128 i. Attractions created around a natural phenomenon or
129 scenic landscape.
130 j. Waterfront marina facilities, including, but not
131 limited to, indoor marine vessel storage, restaurants, and
132 marine sales and service.
133 k. Aquariums."
134 "§40-18-471
135 (a) Prior to the allowance of a tax rebate on
136 transactional taxes, an application shall be filed with the
137 tourism department in the manner established by the
138 department.
139 (b) The tourism department shall adopt standards to be
140 used by the Alabama Tourism Advisory Board for the review and
Page 5

used by the Alabama Tourism Advisory Board for the review and
HB359 Enrolled
141 approval of certified tourism destination projects for which a
142 tax rebate for transactional taxes is sought pursuant to
143 Section 40-18-473.
144 (c) The tourism department shall establish deadlines
145 for applications. Applications shall solicit whatever
146 information the department deems important to its
147 determination of authorizing a tax rebate."
148 "§40-18-472
149 (a) In order for an applicant that proposes a
150 certified tourism destination project to be an approved
151 company, the board shall make both of the following findings:
152 (1) That the project is in fact a certified tourism
153 destination project.
154 (2) That the amount of tourism rebates sought are
155 exceeded by anticipated revenues for the state, including
156 income, property, business privilege, utility, gross receipts,
157 and sales, and use tax revenues that are generated by the
158 economic activity resulting from the project.
159 (b) The Alabama Tourism Advisory Board shall review
160 qualifying projects meeting the criteria established pursuant
161 to Section 40-18-473 and approve eligible projects for tax
162 rebates. Upon a determination that all program requirements
163 are met, the board shall issue an Alabama Tourism Advisory
164 Board Act Certificate. Each certificate shall include the
165 amount of the approved project costs, the maximum rebate
166 available, and the rebate term of 10 years from the completion
167 date or the date on or which five million dollars ($5,000,000)
168 of the approved project costs has been rebated to the
Page 6

of the approved project costs has been rebated to the
HB359 Enrolled
169 applicant, whichever threshold is met first."
170 "§40-18-473
171 (a) A tax rebate from taxes generated within the
172 tourism destination attraction by the certified tourism
173 destination project over a 10-year period from the
174 commencement of operation, which must occur after June 15,
175 2023, in the amount of up to five million dollars ($5,000,000)
176 may be claimed. No approved company may receive more than one
177 million dollars ($1,000,000) in tourism rebates in a calendar
178 year.
179 (b)(1) The tax rebates authorized by this article are
180 limited to an aggregate amount for all certified tourism
181 destination projects of ten million dollars ($10,000,000)
182 annually with 10 percent set aside annually for certified
183 tourism destination projects located in targeted or jumpstart
184 counties.
185 (2) An approved company with a certified tourism
186 destination project may be granted a tax rebate on any
187 combination of the state and local sales and use taxes,
188 lodging taxes, or other transactional taxes generated by or
189 arising within the tourism destination project after June 15,
190 2023.
191 (3) An approved company shall have no obligation to
192 refund or otherwise return any amount of taxes authorized for
193 rebate to the persons from whom the taxes were collected.
194 (4) Rebates authorized under this article shall be for
195 up to 10 years, commencing on the date the tourism attraction
196 opens for business, which must occur after June 15, 2023, and
Page 7

opens for business, which must occur after June 15, 2023, and
HB359 Enrolled
197 begins to collect taxes generated by, or arising within, the
198 tourism destination project.
199 (5) Tax rebates may be a combination of state and local
200 retail sales tax, state and local lodging taxes, and any other
201 taxes generated by, or arising within, the tourism destination
202 project after June 15, 2023. The municipality or the taxing
203 district where the tourism destination project will be located
204 must support and approve the facility. The approval must be in
205 the form of a resolution of the governing authority
206 acknowledging support of the project and acknowledging that a
207 portion no less than 20 percent of the tax rebates will be
208 comprised of municipal taxes.
209 (6) The Alabama Department of Revenue, in consultation
210 with the Alabama Tourism Department, shall adopt rules and
211 require the filing of a rebate form designed by the Alabama
212 Department of Revenue to reflect the intent of this article.
213 To begin the rebate process, once project phases open for
214 business after June 15, 2023, the approved company must
215 provide a listing of all sales tax accounts and account
216 numbers related to the project. The Alabama Department of
217 Revenue will provide these accounts and will begin making the
218 required diversions into the Tourism Project Sales Tax
219 Incentive Fund the month following notification. Rebate
220 payments from the fund will be made each January and July to
221 the approved company.
222 (7) No tax rebate shall be granted to an approved
223 company during a tax year that the approved company is
224 simultaneously receiving any other state tax incentive
Page 8

simultaneously receiving any other state tax incentive
HB359 Enrolled
225 associated with any individual tourism attraction project.
226 (8) Any tax rebate shall be first applied to any
227 outstanding tax obligation of the approved company that is due
228 and payable to the state.
229 (9) Rebates under this article shall be made without
230 interest.
231 (10) Tax rebates authorized under this article are
232 transferrable to future owners of the qualifying tourism
233 destination project.
234 (11) The tax rebate allowed under this article shall be
235 effective beginning August 1, 2023, for projects placed into
236 service after June 15, 2023, and shall continue through July
237 31, 2028, unless continued by an act of the Legislature.
238 (12) Tax rebates for certified tourism destination
239 projects are to be administered by the Alabama Department of
240 Revenue.
241 (c) Notwithstanding the ten million dollar
242 ($10,000,000) annual aggregate cap on tax rebates allowed, the
243 board may approve an annual onetimeone-time designation of an
244 additional two million five hundred thousand dollars
245 ($2,500,000) in tax rebates for one project per calendar year
246 with a minimum capital investment amount of seventy-five
247 million dollars ($75,000,000). Additionally, a company that is
248 awarded the supplemental rebate may claim up to seven million
249 five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000) in total, up to one
250 million five hundred thousand dollars annually ($1,500,000)
251 and is not subject to the caps otherwise provided for in this
252 article.
Page 9

article.
HB359 Enrolled
253 (d) Within three months after the completion date, the
254 approved company shall document the actual cost of the project
255 through certification of the costs by an independent certified
256 public accountant acceptable to the board.
257 (e) For purposes of determining whether a project has
258 met the minimum capital investment requirements, only bona
259 fide, third-party, arms-length capital expenditures shall be
260 included. The certification of project costs required under
261 this subsection shall expressly verify all of the following:
262 (1) Each cost included in the capital investment
263 calculation represents an actual expenditure paid to an
264 independent, third-party vendor not related to the applicant,
265 developer, or any affiliate thereof.
266 (2) No cost included in the calculation consists of any
267 payment, fee, or charge paid directly or indirectly to the
268 project developer, any member, partner, shareholder, manager,
269 officer, affiliate, parent entity, subsidiary, or any entity
270 under common ownership or control, including, but not limited
271 to, developer fees, consulting fees, project-management fees,
272 internal labor allocations, overhead charges, reimbursed
273 salaries, or similar related-party payments.
274 (3) All costs included are properly capitalizable under
275 the Internal Revenue Code and represent legitimate project
276 expenditures necessary for the acquisition, construction, or
277 completion of the certified tourism destination project.
278 (4) Any related-party transactions, if disclosed, are
279 excluded from the capital investment amount used to determine
280 eligibility for the supplemental rebate or any other
Page 10

eligibility for the supplemental rebate or any other
HB359 Enrolled
281 investment-based incentive threshold."
282 Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 11

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB359 Enrolled
283
284
285
286
287
288
289
290
291
292 ________________________________________________
293 Speaker of the House of Representatives
294
295
296
297 ________________________________________________
298 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
299
300
301 House of Representatives
302
303 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
304 was passed by the House 10-Feb-26.
305
306 John Treadwell
307 Clerk
308
309
310
311
312
313 Senate 26-Feb-26 Passed
314
315
316
Page 12